District of Columbia statutes.
29A-201.23

Repealed

Stock book — To be kept by treasurer or secretary; contents.

Repealed.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1287, ch. 854, § 627
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(k)(1), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-201.23.
1981 Ed., § 29-223.
1973 Ed., § 29-223.